California, session 20252026, AB2377.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 17250.6 is added to the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read:17250.6. (a) (1) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, and before January 1, 2032, qualified property placed in service in the state by a qualified taxpayer during the taxable year shall be eligible for a depreciation deduction equal to the following:(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), 50 percent of the adjusted basis of the qualified property. For any subsequent taxable year, standard depreciation rules under this article shall apply to the qualified property.(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), qualified property placed in service in the state in a high-need area by a qualified taxpayer during the taxable year shall be eligible for a depreciation deduction equal to 100 percent of the adjusted basis of the qualified property.(2) The adjusted basis of the qualified property giving rise to a deduction under this section shall be reduced by the amount of that deduction.(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:(1) “High-need area” means a census tract, city, or county with an annual unemployment rate or poverty rate of at least 150 percent of the statewide unemployment rate or poverty rate.(2) “Qualified property” means any of the following:(A) Machinery and equipment, including component parts and contrivances, such as belts, shafts, moving parts, and operating structures.(B) Equipment or devices used or required to operate, control, regulate, or maintain the machinery, including, but not limited to, computers, data-processing equipment, and computer software, together with all repair and replacement parts with a useful life of one or more years therefor, whether purchased separately or in conjunction with a complete machine, and regardless of whether the machine or component parts are assembled by the qualified taxpayer or another party.(C) Tangible personal property used in pollution control that meets standards established by this state or any local or regional governmental agency within this state.(3) “Qualified taxpayer” means a taxpayer that is primarily engaged in a trade or business described in Codes 3111 to 3399, inclusive, 221111 to 221118, inclusive, 221122, or 541713 to 541715, inclusive, of the North American Industry Classification System (NAICS) published by the United States Office of Management and Budget, 2022 edition.(c) To be eligible for the accelerated depreciation deduction authorized by this section, a qualified taxpayer shall place qualified property with adjusted basis of at least one million dollars ($1,000,000) in service in the state during the taxable year.(d) (1) A qualified taxpayer shall certify under penalty of perjury that qualified property placed in service during the taxable year shall be primarily used in the state for at least three years.(2) The Franchise Tax Board shall prescribe any regulations necessary to recapture any benefit received by a taxpayer pursuant to this section where the qualified property is subsequently converted to a nonqualifying use or is primarily used out of state prior to the end of the three-year period prescribed by paragraph (1).(e) (1) For purposes of satisfying Section 41, as it relates to the accelerated depreciation deductions allowed by this section and Section 24349.3, the Legislature finds and declares the following:(A) The goals of the accelerated depreciation deductions are to improve early year cashflow for businesses, particularly those in economically distressed areas, reduce the effective cost of capital in the state, and strengthen California’s competitiveness for new investments in strategic industries.(B) The performance indicators for the Legislature to use in determining if the accelerated depreciation deductions are achieving the stated goals shall be the following:(i) The number of taxpayers claiming an accelerated depreciation deduction on qualified property.(ii) The total dollar value of accelerated depreciation deductions taken on qualified property.(2) The Franchise Tax Board, no later than March 1, 2029, and annually thereafter, shall submit a report to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, detailing the number of taxpayers allowed an accelerated depreciation deduction pursuant to this section and Section 24349.3 and the total dollar value of accelerated depreciation deductions taken on qualified property.(f) This section shall remain operative only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. Section 24349.3 is added to the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read:24349.3. (a) (1) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, and before January 1, 2032, qualified property placed in service in the state by a qualified taxpayer during the taxable year shall be eligible for a depreciation deduction equal to the following:(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), 50 percent of the adjusted basis of the qualified property. For any subsequent taxable year, standard depreciation rules under this article shall apply to the qualified property.(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), qualified property placed in service in the state in a high-need area by a qualified taxpayer during the taxable year shall be eligible for a depreciation deduction equal to 100 percent of the adjusted basis of the qualified property.(2) The adjusted basis of the qualified property giving rise to a deduction under this section shall be reduced by the amount of that deduction.(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:(1) “High-need area” means a census tract, city, or county with an annual unemployment rate or poverty rate of at least 150 percent of the statewide unemployment rate or poverty rate.(2) “Qualified property” means any of the following:(A) Machinery and equipment, including component parts and contrivances, such as belts, shafts, moving parts, and operating structures.(B) Equipment or devices used or required to operate, control, regulate, or maintain the machinery, including, but not limited to, computers, data-processing equipment, and computer software, together with all repair and replacement parts with a useful life of one or more years therefor, whether purchased separately or in conjunction with a complete machine, and regardless of whether the machine or component parts are assembled by the qualified taxpayer or another party.(C) Tangible personal property used in pollution control that meets standards established by this state or any local or regional governmental agency within this state.(3) “Qualified taxpayer” means a taxpayer that is primarily engaged in a trade or business described in Codes 3111 to 3399, inclusive, 221111 to 221118, inclusive, 221122, or 541713 to 541715, inclusive, of the North American Industry Classification System (NAICS) published by the United States Office of Management and Budget, 2022 edition.(c) To be eligible for the accelerated depreciation deduction authorized by this section, a qualified taxpayer shall place qualified property with adjusted basis of at least one million dollars ($1,000,000) in service in the state during the taxable year.(d) (1) A qualified taxpayer shall certify under penalty of perjury that qualified property placed in service during the taxable year shall be primarily used in the state for at least three years.(2) The Franchise Tax Board shall prescribe any regulations necessary to recapture any benefit received by a taxpayer pursuant to this section where the qualified property is subsequently converted to a nonqualifying use or is primarily used out of state prior to the end of the three-year period prescribed by paragraph (1).(e) This section shall remain operative only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.SEC. 4. This act provides for a tax levy within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect.